Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.175

Making a false or misleading statement to a public servant.

A person who knowingly makes a false or misleading material statement to a public servant is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. "Material statement" means a written or oral statement reasonably likely to be relied upon by a public servant in the discharge of his or her official powers or duties.

[ 2001 c 308 s 2. Prior: 1995 c 285 s 32.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2001 c 308: "The purpose of this act is to respond to State v. Thomas, 103 Wn. App. 800, by reenacting, without changes, the law prohibiting materially false or misleading statements to public servants, enacted as sections 32 and 33, chapter 285, Laws of 1995." [ 2001 c 308 s 1.]

Effective date—2001 c 308: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 14, 2001]." [ 2001 c 308 s 4.]

Effective date—1995 c 285: See RCW 48.30A.900.